Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6563XS (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2113 Section 1. Section 99B.1, subsection 11, Code 2026, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 99B.24, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 d. Calendar raffles and build-up Build-up or pyramid raffles 5 are prohibited. 6